Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 7
TELEMEDICINE PILOT PROGRAMS FOR
CHRONIC MEDICAL CONDITIONS

25.5-5-701 to 25.5-5-703. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire part repealed, (HB 10-1322), ch. 29, p. 105, § 1, effective March 18.

Editor's note:

This part 7 was added in 2006 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2010. For the text of this part 7 prior to 2010, consult the 2009 Colorado Revised Statutes.